Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4722
Violations; cease and desist order; penalty.

In lieu of any penalty specified elsewhere in the Prepaid Limited Health Service Organization Act or when no penalty is specifically provided, whenever any prepaid limited health service organization or other person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or entity subject to the act has been found, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, to have violated any provision of the Prepaid Limited Health Service Organization Act, the director may:

(1) Issue and cause to be served upon the organization, person, or other entity charged with the violation a copy of such findings and an order requiring such organization, person, or other entity to cease and desist from engaging in the act or practice which constitutes the violation; and

(2) Impose a monetary penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation but not to exceed an aggregate penalty of ten thousand dollars.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 257.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.